en: Bryndza
hr: bryndza
it: bryndza
pl: bryndza
sk: Bryndza
uk: Бринза, бри́ндза

en: camembert, camembert cheese
xx: camembert
ar: كامامبير
az: Kamamber
be: Камамбер
bg: Камамбер
cv: Камамбер
el: Καμαμπέρ
eo: kamemberto
et: Kamambäär
fa: کامامبر
he: קממבר
hu: camembert, camembert sajt
ja: カマンベールチーズ
kk: Камамбер
ko: 카망베르
lv: kamambērs
mk: Камамбер
pl: camembert
ru: Камамбер
sl: Kamamber
sr: kamamber
uk: Камамбер
yi: קאמעמבערט
zh: 卡芒贝尔奶酪

en: camembert from pasteurised milk
ca: camembert de llet pasteuritzada
es: camembert de leche pasteurizada
fr: camembert au lait pasteurisé
hr: camembert od pasteriziranog mlijeka
it: camembert da latte pastorizzato

en: cantal
xx: cantal
ar: كانتال
fa: کانتال
hy: Կանտալ
ja: カンタル
jv: Kèju cantal
ko: 캉탈
ru: Канталь
uk: Канталь
zh: 康塔爾芝士

en: Cantal cheese half matured from cow's milk
fr: Cantal entre-deux
hr: cantal sir poluzreo od kravljeg mlijeka

en: Cantal Salers
fr: Cantal Salers
hr: cantal salers
it: cantal Salers

en: Laguiole cheese from cow's milk
fr: Laguiole
hr: laguiole sir od kravljeg mlijeka

en: Chaource cheese
fr: Chaource
hr: chaource sir
it: formaggio Chaource

en: cheddar, cheddar cheese, cheddar cheese from cow's milk
xx: cheddar
af: Cheddarkaas
ar: جبنة تشيدر
bg: чедър
ca: cheddar, formatge cheddar
cs: čedar
cv: Чеддер
cy: Caws Cheddar
da: cheddarost, andre oste af cheddar typen
de: Cheddar, Cheddarkäse
el: Τσένταρ
eo: Ĉedder
es: cheddar, queso Cheddar
et: cheddar, Cheddari juust
eu: Cheddar gazta
fa: پنیر چدار
fi: cheddar-juusto, cheddarjuusto
fr: fromage cheddar
ga: céadar
he: צ'דר
hr: cheddar, cheddar sir, tvrdi sir Cheddar
hu: Cheddar, Cheddar sajt
hy: Չեդեր
id: Keju Cheddar
is: Cheddar-ostur
it: Formaggio cheddar
ja: チェダーチーズ
ka: ჩედერი
kn: ಚೆಡರ್ ಚೀಸ್
ko: 체더 치즈
lt: Čederis
lv: Čedars
ms: Keju Cheddar
nb: cheddarost
nl: cheddarkaas
pl: cheddar, ser cheddar
ru: Чеддер
sk: Čedar
sl: Čedar
sv: cheddar, cheddarost
uk: Чеддер
vi: Pho mát Cheddar
zh: 車打芝士

en: mild cheddar, mild cheddar cheese
de: milder Cheddar
fr: fromage cheddar jeune
hr: blagi cheddar
it: cheddar dolce

en: medium mature cheddar, medium mature cheddar cheese, medium cheddar cheese
de: Medium Mature Cheddar, mittelreifer Cheddar-Käse
hr: srednje zreli cheddar
it: cheddar mediamente maturo

en: mature cheddar, mature cheddar cheese
de: Gereifter Cheddarkäse, Cheddar gereift
fr: fromage cheddar affiné
hr: zreli cheddar
it: cheddar stagionato

en: extra mature cheddar, extra mature cheddar cheese
de: Extra Mature Cheddar
fr: fromage cheddar très affiné
hr: ekstra zreli cheddar
it: cheddar extra maturo

en: vintage cheddar, vintage cheddar cheese
de: Vintage Cheddar
hr: vintage cheddar
it: cheddar vintage

en: cheddar powder
ca: formatge cheddar pols, cheddar en pols
es: queso cheddar polvo, cheddar en polvo
hr: cheddar prah
it: cheddar in polvere

en: white cheddar, white cheddar cheese
es: cheddar blanco, queso cheddar blanco
fr: Cheddar blanc
hr: bijeli cheddar
it: cheddar bianco

en: coloured cheddar, colored cheddar
hr: obojeni cheddar
it: cheddar colorato

en: red cheddar
fr: cheddar orange, cheddar rouge
hr: crveni cheddar
it: cheddar rosso

en: melted cheddar
ca: cheddar fos
es: queso cheddar fundido
fr: cheddar fondu
hr: rastopljeni cheddar
it: cheddar fuso

en: Colby cheese, Colby
ca: colby
hr: colby sir
id: Keju colby
it: Colby
ja: コルビーチーズ
jv: Kèju colby
ko: 콜비 치즈
pt: Colby
zh: 考爾比芝士